Florida, session 2026, HB749.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 901.02, Florida
Statutes, is amended, and subsection (1) of that section is
republished, to read:
901.02 Issuance of arrest warrants.—
(1) A judge, upon examination of the complaint and proofs
submitted, if satisfied that probable cause exists for the
issuance of an arrest warrant for any crime committed within the
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb749-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 749 2026
judge's jurisdiction, shall thereupon issue an arrest warrant
signed by the judge with the judge's name of office.
(2) If a complaint alleges the commission of a misdemeanor
only, a judge may The court may issue a warrant for the
defendant's arrest when all of the following circumstances
apply:
(a) Issue an arrest warrant in accordance with subsection
(1); or A complaint has been filed charging the commission of a
misdemeanor only.
(b) In his or her discretion, issue a The summons pursuant
to s. 901.09(2) or a notice to appear in lieu of an arrest
warrant if she or he reasonably believes that the person against
whom the complaint was made will appear upon the summons or
notice to appear and does not believe that special conditions of
pretrial release are necessary to protect the victim or the
community issued to the defendant has been returned unserved.
(c) The conditions of subsection (1) are met.
Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 901.09, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
901.09 When summons shall be issued.—
(2) When the complaint is for a misdemeanor that the trial
court judge is not empowered to try summarily, the trial court
judge may shall issue a summons instead of a warrant if she or
he reasonably believes that the person against whom the
complaint was made will appear upon a summons and does not
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb749-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 749 2026
believe that special conditions of pretrial release are
necessary to protect the victim or the community.
Section 3. Subsection (6) of section 901.15, Florida
Statutes, is amended, and new paragraphs (h) and (i) are added
to subsection (9) of that section, to read:
901.15 When arrest by officer without warrant is lawful.—A
law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant
when:
(6) There is probable cause to believe that the person has
committed a criminal act according to s. 790.233 or according to
s. 741.31, s. 784.047, s. 784.0487, or s. 825.1036 which
violates an injunction for protection entered pursuant to s.
741.30, s. 784.046, s. 784.0485, or s. 825.1035 or a foreign
protection order accorded full faith and credit pursuant to s.
741.315, over the objection of the petitioner, if necessary.
(9) There is probable cause to believe that the person has
committed:
(h) Driving under the influence in violation of s.
316.193.
(i) Boating under the influence in violation of s. 327.35.
Section 4. Subsections (6), (7), and (8) are added to
section 933.02, Florida Statutes, to read:
933.02 Grounds for issuance of search warrant.—Upon proper
affidavits being made, a search warrant may be issued under the
provisions of this chapter upon any of the following grounds:
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb749-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 749 2026
(6) When a sample of the blood of a person or any property
constitutes evidence relevant to proving that a violation of s.
316.193 or s. 327.35 has been committed.
(7) When the laws in relation to domestic violence, as
defined in s. 741.28(2), have been or are violated in any
particular building or place.
(8) When the laws in relation to any misdemeanor offense
which involves the use or threat of physical force or violence
against any individual have been or are violated in any
particular building or place.

This section also applies to any papers or documents used as a
means of or in aid of the commission of any offense against the
laws of the state.
Section 5. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb749-00